Utah statutes.
72-1-201.   Creation of Department of Transportation -- Functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities.

There is created the Department of Transportation which shall:

(1)  have the general responsibility for planning, research, design, construction, maintenance, security, and safety of state transportation systems;

(2)  provide administration for state transportation systems and programs;

(3)  implement the transportation policies of the state;

(4)  plan, develop, construct, and maintain state transportation systems that are safe, reliable, environmentally sensitive, and serve the needs of the traveling public, commerce, and industry;

(5)  establish standards and procedures regarding the technical details of administration of the state transportation systems as established by statute and administrative rule;

(6)  advise the governor and the Legislature about state transportation systems needs;

(7)  coordinate with utility companies for the reasonable, efficient, and cost-effective installation, maintenance, operation, relocation, and upgrade of utilities within state highway rights-of-way;

(8)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make policy and rules for the administration of the department, state transportation systems, and programs; and

(9)  annually report to an appropriate legislative committee as designated by the Legislative Management Committee the transfers that need to be made between all transportation-related funds to maintain the state highway construction program as prioritized by the commission.

